trunk/apertium-eo-es/apertium-eo-es.eo.dix
<pardef n="ino__n">
<e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oj</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ino</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>inoj</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ojn</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>inon</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>inojn</l>     <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>oj</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>ojn</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>oj</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>ojn</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Paradigma article -->


<pardef n="la__det">
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="mia__det">
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>jn</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="dem__det">
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>jn</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

 
<pardef n="ambaŭ__det">
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ind__det">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jn</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ind__adj">
<e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>jn</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="quant__det">
<e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>jn</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!--
<pardef n="ser__vb">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intajn</l>    <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ontaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ante</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inte</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intan</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intajn</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
-->

<e lm="praktikanto de telepatio"><i>praktikant</i><par n="ino__n"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>telepatio</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>telepatio</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="alia">            <i>alia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="almozulo">        <i>almozul</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="ambaŭ">           <i>ambaŭ</i><par n="ambaŭ__det"/></e>
<e lm="antaŭkandidato">  <i>antaŭkandidat</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="artileriano">     <i>artilerian</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="azerbajĝano">     <i>azerbajĝan</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="banknoto">        <i>banknot</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="biografo">        <i>biograf</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="burokrato">       <i>burokrat</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="dermatologo">     <i>dermatolog</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="diversa">         <i>diversa</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="dommastro">       <i>dommastr</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="ekspansiisto">    <i>ekspansiist</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="enkrakisto">      <i>enkrakist</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="fantomo">         <i>fantom</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="fondinto">        <i>fondint</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="gapulo">          <i>gapul</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="gondolisto">      <i>gondolist</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="hidrografo">      <i>hidrograf</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="ideologo">        <i>ideolog</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="ilia">            <i>ilia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="instruanto">      <i>instruant</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="ĉeĉeno">          <i>ĉeĉen</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="iu">              <i>iu</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="iu">              <i>iu</i><par n="ind__adj"/></e>
<e lm="iu">              <i>iu</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="kandidato">       <i>kandidat</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="kazuisto">        <i>kazuist</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="kelka">           <i>kelka</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="kompano">         <i>kompan</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="konsumanto">      <i>konsumant</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="koruptito">       <i>koruptit</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="keltibero">         <i>keltiber</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="la">              <i>la</i><par n="la__det"/></e>
<e lm="la alia">         <i>la<b/>alia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="la sama">         <i>la<b/>sama</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="la tuta">         <i>la<b/>tuta</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="lernanto">        <i>lernant</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="sia">             <i>sia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="lia">             <i>lia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="luprenanto">      <i>luprenant</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="malmulta">        <i>malmulta</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="manĉuo">          <i>manĉu</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="menĉevisto">      <i>menĉevist</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="mia">             <i>mia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="multa">           <i>multa</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="multa">           <i>multega</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="navarano">        <i>navaran</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="neniu">           <i>neniu</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="nia">             <i>nia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="orfo">            <i>orf</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="peranto">         <i>perant</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="plura">           <i>plura</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="eksprezidento">      <i>eksprezident</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="responsulo">      <i>responsul</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="senkulpulo">      <i>senkulpul</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="spektatoro">      <i>spektator</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="teŭtono">         <i>teŭton</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="tia">             <i>tia</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="tiu">             <i>tiu</i><par n="dem__det"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="unu">             <i>unu</i><par n="ambaŭ__det"/></e>
<e lm="via">             <i>via</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="vicdirektoro">    <i>vicdirektor</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="ĉi tiu">          <i>ĉi<b/>tiu</i><par n="dem__det"/></e>
<e lm="ĉiu">             <i>ĉiu</i><par n="ind__det"/></e>
<e lm="ĉiu">             <i>ĉiu</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="ĝia">             <i>ĝia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="ĥano">            <i>ĥan</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="ŝia">             <i>ŝia</i><par n="mia__det"/></e>
<e lm="virtuozo">            <i>virtuoz</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="privatulo">            <i>privatul</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="aldisto">            <i>aldist</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
<e lm="framasono">            <i>framason</i><par n="ino__n"/></e>
